Illinois, session 104th, HB3391.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by adding 5Section 3-699.26 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/3-699.26 new)7    Sec. 3-699.26. Retro license plates. 8    (a) The Secretary, upon receipt of an application made in 9the form prescribed by the Secretary, may issue special 10registration plates designated as retro license plates. The 11special plates issued under this Section shall be affixed only 12to passenger vehicles of the first division, motorcycles, 13autocycles, and motor vehicles of the second division weighing 14not more than 8,000 pounds. Plates issued under this Section 15shall expire according to the multi-year procedure established 16by Section 3-414.1 of this Code.17    (b) The design and color of the plates shall be a replica 18of the license plates issued between 1983 and 2001. The 19Secretary may allow the plates to be issued as vanity plates or 20personalized under Section 3-405.1 of this Code. 21    (c) An applicant for the special plate shall be charged a 22$40 fee for original issuance, in addition to the appropriate 23registration fees. For each registration renewal period, a $27   HB3391 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 09242 LNS 19299 b1fee shall be charged. The additional fees under this 2subsection shall be used to cover the costs of production and 3provide technology and modernization updates.